Hawaii statutes.
[§601-21] Substance abuse treatment
monitoring program. (a) To determine the effectiveness of substance abuse
treatment services and maintain accurate numbers of individuals receiving
publicly funded substance abuse treatment, the judiciary shall comply with the
requirements of the statewide substance abuse treatment monitoring program
established under section 321-192.5. The judiciary shall collect data in
accordance with section 321-192.5 from any circuit court, adult probation, and
any provider of substance abuse treatment that provides substance abuse
treatment to persons served through public funds administered by the judiciary.

(b) The judiciary shall include in the
contract with any treatment provider all criteria established by the department
of health pursuant to section 321-192.5 to determine whether the treatment
provider is achieving success in treating individuals with substance abuse.

(c) The judiciary shall include the
information collected under subsection (a) as part of the annual report
submitted pursuant to section 601-2.

(d) This section shall not be construed to
abrogate an individual's right to privacy. The judiciary shall implement
sufficient protections to ensure that the identity of a recipient of substance
abuse treatment services remains strictly confidential and that aggregate data
collected pursuant to this section is used solely for the purpose of this
section. [L 2004, c 40, §26]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next